California, session 20252026, AB1796.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) In California there are roughly 7.5 billion 7,500,000,000 square feet of existing professional buildings.(2) More than 100,000,000 square feet of professional buildings are newly constructed across California California, and this does not account for the remodeling of existing space, which sometimes only needs a designer.(3) The number of individuals who utilize professional buildings is significant, but difficult to approximate. In 2023, California had 18,400,000 employed people, the highest in the United States. About 88 percent of employed Californians, or roughly 16,200,000 people, work onsite, occupying professional space on a daily basis. This number does not capture those Californians who visit or pass through professional buildings to conduct tasks or business.(4) Professional space includes, but is not limited to, hospitals, schools, college campuses, museums, retail stores, and airport terminals.(5) Thirty-one jurisdictions across the nation regulate the profession of interior design, including 29 states, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico.(6) The Legislature recognizes that acceptable overlap between licensed design professions occurs through coordinated practice within defined scope boundaries, consistent with nationally recognized professional standards governing architecture, engineering, and interior design professions.(b) Given the quantity and scope of professional interior design space in California, the regulation of professional interior designers would ensure a reliable standard of practice, directly benefiting and protecting many Californians who work, study, visit, and convalesce in these spaces.SEC. 2. Section 5510 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5510. There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a California Architects Board, which consists of 11 members.Any reference in law to the California Board of Architectural Examiners shall mean the California Architects Board.This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed. Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.SEC. 3. Section 5510.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5510.1. The Legislature finds and declares that it is the mandate of the board to regulate the practice of architects and licensed professional interior designers in the interest and for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare. For this purpose, the board shall delineate the minimum professional qualifications and performance standards for admission to and practice of the profession of architecture pursuant to this chapter and licensed professional interior designers pursuant to the Licensed Professional Interior Designer Practice Act (Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5700)). The board shall establish a fair and uniform enforcement policy to deter and prosecute violations of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter to provide for the protection of the consumer.SEC. 4. Section 5514 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5514. (a) The membership of the board shall be composed of 11 members, five 5 of whom shall be architects, one 1 of whom shall be a professional interior designer, and five 5 of whom shall be public members.(b) The five architect members of the board shall be selected from architects in good standing who have been licensed and in practice in this state for at least five years at the time of appointment, all of whom shall be residents and in practice in California.(c) The public members of the board shall not be licensees of the board.(d) The first appointed professional interior designer member of the board shall have had an active National Council for Interior Design Qualification Certification for at least five years at the time of appointment, and shall be a resident and in practice in California. After licensure for professional interior designers is established, the one professional interior designer member of the board shall have been in good standing, licensed, a resident, and in practice in California for at least five years at the time of appointment.SEC. 5. Section 5515 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5515. (a) Every person appointed shall serve for four years and until the appointment and qualification of their successor or until one year has elapsed since the expiration of the term for which they were appointed, whichever occurs first.(b) No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.(c) Vacancies occurring before the expiration of the term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term.(d) Each appointment shall expire on June 30 of the fourth year following the year in which the previous term expired.(e) The Governor shall appoint three of the public members and the six licensed members qualified as provided in Section 5514. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.SEC. 6. Section 5515.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5515.5. (a) Notwithstanding Section 130 or 5515, the following provisions shall apply:(1) Of the three licensed architects appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2013, the term of two members shall expire on June 30, 2017, and the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2019.(2) Of the two licensed architects appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2014, the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2018, and the term of the other member shall expire on June 30, 2020.(3) The term of the public member appointed by the Governor that commences on July 1, 2014, shall expire on June 30, 2019.(4) Of the two public members appointed by the Governor whose terms commence on July 1, 2016, the term of one member shall expire on June 30, 2020, and the term of the other member shall expire on June 30, 2021.(5) The term of the licensed professional interior designer appointed by the Governor that commences on July 1, ____, shall expire on June 30, ____.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), this section shall not be construed to affect the application of Section 130 or 5515 to the terms of a current or future member of the board.SEC. 7. Section 5526 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5526. (a) The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the examination of applicants for licenses to practice architecture and licensed professional interior design in this state.(b) The board may, by rule or regulation, adopt rules of professional conduct that are not inconsistent with state or federal law. Every person who holds a license issued by the board shall be governed and controlled by these rules.(c) The board may adopt other rules and regulations as may be necessary and proper.(d) The board may, from time to time, repeal, amend, or modify rules and regulations adopted under this section. No rule or regulation shall be inconsistent with this chapter.(e) The board shall adopt, by regulation, a system as described in Section 125.9 for the issuance to a licensee of a citation and a system as described in Section 148 for the issuance of an administrative citation to an unlicensed person who is acting in the capacity of a licensee or registrant under the jurisdiction of the board.(f) The adoption, repeal, amendment, or modification of these rules and regulations shall be made in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 8. Section 5528 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5528. (a) The board may select and contract with necessary architect and professional interior design consultants who are licensed to assist it in its enforcement program on an intermittent basis. The architect and professional interior design consultants shall perform only those services that are necessary to carry out and enforce this chapter.(b) For the purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, any consultant under contract with the board shall be considered a public employee.SEC. 9. Section 5601 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5601. (a) Within 10 days after the beginning of every month, all fees collected by the department for the month preceding, under the provisions of this chapter, shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Architects Board Fund.(b) The board may create subaccounts within the California Architects Board Fund, as needed, for the purpose of ensuring that moneys within the fund are equitably apportioned among the architect and professional interior design professions and do not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs of the board pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5700).SEC. 10. Section 5602 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5602. The money collected pursuant to this chapter and paid into the California Architects Board Fund, which is hereby continued in existence, shall be used in the manner prescribed by law to defray the expenses of the board in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.SEC. 11. Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5700) is added to Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 3.8. Licensed Professional Interior Designer Practice Act Article 1. Definitions5700. This chapter may be cited as the Licensed Professional Interior Designer Practice Act.5701. For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Board” means the California Architects Board. (b) “Construction observation services” means periodic observation of, or visits by a licensed professional interior designer or their agent to, the site of a work of improvement to determine general compliance with the professional interior instruments of service submissions. However, “construction observation services” does not mean the superintendence of construction processes, site conditions, operations, equipment, or personnel, or the maintenance of a safe place to work or any safety in, on, or about the site.(c) “Immediate and responsible direction” means the professional interior designer does both of the following:(1) Instructs any person in the preparation of a professional interior instrument of service, unless the person is any of the following:(A) A licensed professional interior designer.(B) An architect licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500).(C) A civil or structural engineer registered pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700).(2) Exercises the same judgment and responsibility in reviewing all stages of the design documents and other phases of the work as required by law, and which would normally be exercised if the professional interior designer personally performed the required tasks.(d) “Licensed professional interior designer” means a person who is licensed under this chapter.(e) “Licensed contractor” means a person licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).(f) “Professional engineer” means a person who practices or offers to practice professional engineering as described in Section 6701.(g) (1) “Professional interior design” includes offering or furnishing, or being responsible for, or in control of, the planning, design, and oversight of interior spaces, in part or in whole, in buildings and structures in California in a manner complying with generally applicable codes and regulations. This may include any of the following related to interior spaces or environments as part of a construction project:(A) Investigation, evaluation, consultation, and advice.(B) The preparation of plans, specifications, documentation, and assistance in the governmental review process related to the functional and aesthetic arrangement of interior spaces, including the preparation of professional interior instruments of service.(C) The selection and specification of materials, finishes, fixtures, and furniture.(D) The coordination of the work with technical and special consultants.(E) The administration of contracts and observation of construction.(2) “Professional interior design” does not include any of the following:(A) The practice of a professional engineer, as defined in Section 6701, or the practice of a professional land surveyor, as defined in Section 8701.(B) Services that constitute the practice of architecture, as defined in Section 5500.1, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.(C) Services that constitute the practice of a structural engineer, as described in Section 6763.(D) Changes to the construction classification of the building or structure according to the California Building Standards Code.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “professional interior design” does not include any work that would require structural engineering analysis or would require the licensed professional interior designer to assume responsible control for a building’s structural systems, including the lateral force resisting system and the seismic bracing of components and equipment regulated by the authority having jurisdiction through adoption of a building code or other regulations.(h) “Professional interior instruments of service” means the designs, drawings, and specifications that establish the scope of professional interior design to be constructed, the standard of quality for materials, workmanship, equipment, and construction systems, and the studies and other technical reports and calculations prepared in the course of the practice of licensed professional interior design.(i) “Professional land surveyor” means a person who practices or offers to practice land surveying, as described in Section 8701.(j) (1) “Responsible control” means the amount of control over the content of all professional interior instruments of service during their preparation that is ordinarily exercised by licensed professional interior designers applying the required professional standard of care. Professional responsibility and liability shall attach only to those aspects of the work performed within the licensed professional interior designer’s scope of practice and under their responsible control.(2) “Responsible control” does not require the licensed professional interior designer to personally prepare all professional interior design instruments of service, but requires the exercise of professional judgment and supervisory authority consistent with the professional standard of care applicable to licensed professional interior designers.(k) “Structural engineer” means a person authorized to use the title “structural engineer” as described in Section 6736. Article 2. Administration5705. (a) The board is vested with all of the functions, duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction concerning the practice of licensed professional interior design under this chapter.(b) Pursuant to this chapter, the board shall exercise the following functions, powers, and duties:(1) Conduct or authorize examinations to ascertain the fitness and qualifications of applicants for licensure and issue a license to those who are found to be fit and qualified.(2) Prescribe rules and regulations for a method of examination of candidates. The board shall designate as its examination for licensure as a professional interior designer the National Council for Interior Design Qualification Examination.(3) Conduct hearings on proceedings to revoke, suspend, or refuse to issue licensure.(4) Promulgate rules and regulations required for the administration of this chapter.(c) The board shall implement the provisions of this chapter no later than July 1, 2028. Article 3. Application of Chapter5710. (a) The board shall determine eligibility requirements, including, but not limited to, examination and education requirements necessary for licensure pursuant to this chapter. The board shall give special consideration to national examinations, but is not precluded from prescribing the examination and educational requirements specified in former Section 5811.1, as that section read on December 31, 2026.(b) The board may also prescribe relevant continuing educational requirements, taking into account the cost to individual licensed professional interior designers.(c) The board may determine whether education or training is required for professional interior designers to identify when architectural or engineering services are required and appropriately coordinate with, or refer those services to, licensed professionals authorized to perform them. If the board determines that education or training is required, the board shall develop and prescribe sufficient education or training.(d) The board shall not limit consideration of educational requirements for licensure to any accredited two-year, three-year, or four-year program.5711. (a) It is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine civil penalty of not less than ____ dollars ($____) nor more than ____ dollars ($____) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment, for a person to do any of the following without possessing a valid, unrevoked license as provided in this chapter:(1) Engage in the practice of licensed professional interior design.(2) Use the titles or terms “licensed professional interior designer” or “licensed professional interior design,” or any other titles, words, or abbreviations that would imply or indicate that they are licensed under this chapter.(3) Use the stamp of a licensed professional interior designer, as provided in Section 5720.(4) Advertise or put out a sign, card, or other device that might indicate to the public that they are a licensed professional interior designer or qualified to engage in the practice of licensed professional interior design.(b) A licensed professional interior designer with a valid license may stamp, seal, and submit professional interior instruments of service to the authorities having jurisdiction.(c) A licensed professional interior designer shall not advertise any services that they are not legally permitted to perform, including architecture or engineering services or using the title “architect” in any form.(d) This chapter does not prevent or restrict any of the following activities:(1) The employment by a professional interior designer association, partnership, or corporation furnishing interior design services for remuneration of any person who is not a licensed professional interior designer to perform services in various capacities as needed, provided that the person does not represent themselves as, or use the title of, “licensed professional interior designer.”(2) Use of the title “interior designer” on the part of a person not licensed under this chapter, provided that person does not represent themselves as, or use the title of, “licensed professional interior designer.”(3) The practice, services, or activities of any person licensed in this state under any other law who is engaging in the profession or occupation for which they are licensed or otherwise legally permitted to engage in.(4) Professional services limited to the design of kitchen and bath spaces or the specification of products for kitchen and bath areas in residential settings.(5) The ability of a licensed professional interior designer to supervise their own projects.(6) The provision of interior design or interior decorator services by any person or retail activity, if the person does not use the title “licensed professional interior designer” or “licensed professional interior design,” or any title, word, or abbreviation that would imply or indicate that they are licensed under this chapter.5712. (a) A licensed professional interior designer shall use a written contract when contracting to provide professional services to a client pursuant to this chapter. That written contract shall be executed by the licensed professional interior designer and the client, or the client’s representative, prior to the licensed professional interior designer commencing work, unless the client knowingly states in writing that work may be commenced before the contract is executed. The written contract shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following items:(1) A description of the project for which the client is seeking services.(2) A description of the services to be provided by the licensed professional interior designer to the client.(3) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract and the method of payment agreed upon by both parties.(4) The name, address, and license number of the licensed professional interior designer, the name and address of the client, and the project address.(5) A description of the procedure that the licensed professional interior designer and the client will use to accommodate additional services and contract changes, including, but not limited to, changes in the description of the project, in the description of the services, or in the description of the compensation and method of payment.(6) A description of the procedure to be used by either party to terminate the contract.(7) A statement identifying the ownership and use of professional interior instruments of service prepared by the licensed professional interior designer.(8) A statement in at least 12-point type that reads, “Licensed professional interior designers are licensed and regulated by the California Architects Board located at 2420 Del Paso Road, Suite 105, Sacramento, CA 95834.”(b) This section does not apply to any of the following:(1) Professional services rendered by a licensed professional interior designer for which the client will not pay compensation.(2) An arrangement as to the basis for compensation and manner of providing professional services implied by the fact that the licensed professional interior designer’s services are of the same general kind that the licensed professional interior designer has previously rendered to and received payment from the same client.(3) If the client knowingly states in writing after full disclosure of this section that a writing that complies with the requirements of this section is not required.(4) Professional services rendered by a licensed professional interior designer to a professional engineer registered to practice engineering under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), a land surveyor licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700), an architect licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500), or a contractor licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).5713. (a) As used in this section, the word “person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, general corporation, professional corporation, or limited liability partnership, as authorized by the Corporations Code.(b) As used in this section, the terms “business entity” and “collaboration” include employer and employee relationships, joint ventures, partnerships, general corporations, and consulting relationships formed by written agreement in which the licensed professional interior designer provides immediate and responsible direction of professional interior design services.(c) This chapter does not prevent a licensed professional interior designer from forming a business entity or collaborating with persons who are not licensed professional interior designers, provided that any licensed professional interior designers’ professional services that are provided through that entity or collaboration are offered and provided under the responsible control of a licensed professional interior designer, or licensed professional interior designers, and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.(d) (1) A business entity organized as a general corporation may include in its name any or all of the following:(A) A fictitious name.(B) The name of one or more licensed professional interior designers.(C) The term “licensed professional interior designer,” the term “licensed professional interior design,” or a variation of the terms “licensed professional interior designer” and “licensed professional interior design.”(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) shall limit a business entity organized as a general corporation from including in its name any other word or name that is not otherwise prohibited by law.(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), a business entity organized as a general corporation shall not include in its name the term “professional corporation.”(e) This chapter does not prevent a corporation from furnishing or supplying by contract licensed professional interior design services, as long as any licensed professional interior designers’ professional services are offered and provided under the responsible control of a licensed professional interior designer, licensed professional interior designers, or those design professionals exempt from this chapter pursuant to Section 5715.5714. Nothing in this chapter shall preclude any activities listed in the definition of a “certified interior designer” in former Section 5800, as it read on December 31, 2026, if that person does not represent themselves or their services in any manner prohibited by this chapter.5715. Professional engineers registered to practice engineering under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700), land surveyors licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700), architects licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500), and contractors licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) are exempt from this chapter. However, they may not use the title “licensed professional interior designer” unless they hold a license as required in this chapter. Article 4. Seal and Certification5720. (a) (1) Any stamp used by a licensed professional interior designer under this chapter shall be of a design authorized by the board and shall, at a minimum, bear the licensee’s name, their license number, the legend “Licensed Professional Interior Designer,” and the legend “State of California,” and shall provide a means of indicating the renewal date of the license.(2) The licensed professional interior designer shall affix the signature, current date, date of license expiration, and seal to the first sheet of any bound set or loose sheets of professional interior instruments of service used as contract documents between parties to the contract or documents prepared for the review and approval of any governmental or public authority having jurisdiction by that licensed professional interior designer or under that licensed professional interior designer’s responsible control.(3) The sheet of professional interior instruments of service in which the seal is affixed shall indicate those documents or parts thereof for which the seal shall apply.(4) A licensed professional interior designer shall not be deemed professionally responsible for the design, performance, or adequacy of any structural, mechanical, electrical, plumbing, or fire and life safety systems not prepared by or under the responsible control of the licensed professional interior designer.(5) A licensed professional interior designer who signs or seals professional interior design instruments of service represents that the work was prepared by the licensed professional interior designer or under the licensed professional interior designer’s responsible control.(b) A licensed professional interior designer shall not sign and seal professional interior instruments of service that were not prepared by or under the responsible control of the licensed professional interior designer, except in the following circumstances:(1) A licensed professional interior designer may sign and seal those portions of the professional interior instruments of service submission that were prepared by or under the responsible control of a person who holds a license under this chapter, and who has signed and sealed the documents, if the licensed professional interior designer has reviewed in whole or in part those portions and has either coordinated their preparation or integrated them into the work.(2) A partner or corporate officer of a professional design firm registered in this state who has professional knowledge of the content of the professional interior instrument of services submissions and intends to be responsible for the adequacy of the professional interior instruments of services submissions may sign and seal professional interior instruments of service submissions that are prepared by or under the responsible control of a licensed professional interior designer who is in the regular employment of the professional design firm.(c) The licensed professional interior designer exercising responsible control under which the professional interior instruments of service submissions or portions of the professional interior instruments of service submissions were prepared shall be identified by name and California license number.(d) If engineering, structural engineering, or licensed land surveying services are required in association with a project being performed by a licensed professional interior designer, the documents that have already been properly sealed by a licensed professional engineer, licensed structural engineer, or licensed land surveyor may be compiled by a licensed professional interior designer. Each design professional shall seal the respective documents and shall not seal a document that was not prepared under the design professional’s responsible charge. For all other projects, engineering, structural engineering, or land surveying services shall be procured separately from the licensed professional interior designer. Article 5. Professional Interior Instrument of Service Submissions5725. (a) (1) All professional interior instruments of service submissions intended for use in this state shall be prepared and administered in accordance with standards of reasonable professional skill and diligence. Care shall be taken to reflect the requirements of state law and, if applicable, county and municipal ordinances in the submissions. In recognition that professional interior designers are required to be licensed for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare, submissions shall be of such quality and scope, and be so administered, as to conform to professional standards.(2) An officer, board, commission, or other public entity that receives professional interior instruments of service submissions shall not accept for filing or approval any professional interior instruments of service submissions from an individual who is not licensed under this chapter and is not otherwise licensed in this state to prepare the plans and specifications.(3) (A) A licensed professional interior designer who seals and signs professional interior instruments of service submissions is not responsible for damage caused by subsequent changes to, or uses of, those professional interior instruments of service submissions if the subsequent changes or uses, including changes to uses made by state or local agencies, are not authorized or approved in writing by the licensed professional interior designer who originally sealed and signed the professional interior instruments of service submissions.(B) The stamp and seal of professional interior instruments of service that relate to the design of a project does not impose a legal duty or responsibility upon the person signing the professional interior instruments of service to observe the construction undertaken to create the professional interior design. However, this subparagraph does not prohibit a licensed professional interior designer and a client from entering into a contractual agreement that includes a mutually acceptable arrangement for the provision of construction observation services. This subparagraph does not modify the liability of a licensed professional interior designer who undertakes, contractually or otherwise, the provision of construction observation services for rendering those services.(C) A licensed professional interior designer shall be professionally responsible only for those aspects of a project that are within the licensed professional interior designer’s scope of practice and under their responsible control, and shall not be deemed responsible for the design, performance, or adequacy of any structural, mechanical, electrical, plumbing, or fire and life safety systems not prepared, directed, or approved by the licensed professional interior designer.(D) In the event of damage to commercial real property caused by a natural disaster declared by the Governor, a licensed professional interior designer shall not be liable for damages arising from the reuse, replication, or reconstruction of professional interior instruments of service without the licensed professional interior designer’s prior written consent if the instruments of service were not originally prepared for that reuse.(b) No person may use a licensed professional interior designer’s professional interior instruments of service without the consent of the licensed professional interior designer in a written contract, written agreement, or written license specifically authorizing that use.(c) A licensed professional interior designer shall not unreasonably withhold consent to use their professional interior instruments of service from a person for whom the licensed professional interior designer provided the services. A licensed professional interior designer may reasonably withhold consent to use the professional interior instruments of service for cause, including, but not limited to, lack of full payment for services provided or failure to fulfill the conditions of a written contract.(d) Coordination with, consultation with, or incorporation of work prepared by a licensed architect, professional engineer, or other design professional shall not be construed as assuming professional responsibility or liability for such work, unless the licensed professional interior designer expressly assumes such responsibility in writing and is legally authorized to do so. Article 6. Discipline5730. (a) The board may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the verified complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any licensed professional interior designer, and may suspend for a period not exceeding one year, or revoke, the license of any licensed professional interior designer who is guilty of any one or more of the acts or omissions constituting grounds for disciplinary action under this chapter.(b) (1) An accusation against a licensed professional interior designer shall be filed within three years after the board discovers, or through the use of reasonable diligence should have discovered, the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action or within six years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, whichever occurs first. However, with respect to an accusation alleging a violation of subdivision (f), the accusation may be filed within three years after the discovery by the board of the alleged facts constituting the fraud or misrepresentation prohibited by subdivision (f).(2) If any accusation is not filed within the time provided in this subdivision, no action against a licensed professional interior designer shall be commenced under this article.(c) Any proceeding for the suspension or revocation of licensure under this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The board shall have all of the powers granted in that chapter.(d) (1) A suspended license is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this chapter, but that renewal does not entitle the licensed professional interior designer, while it remains suspended and until it is reinstated, to engage in the activity to which the license relates, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which it was suspended.(2) A revoked license is subject to expiration as provided in this chapter, but it may not be renewed. If it is reinstated after its expiration, the licensed professional interior designer, as a condition precedent to its reinstatement, shall pay a reinstatement fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee in effect on the last regular renewal date before the date on which it is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time of its revocation.(e) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer is practicing in violation of this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(f) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has obtained the license by fraud or misrepresentation, or that the person named in the license has obtained it by fraud or misrepresentation, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(g) The fact that the professional interior designer is impersonating a licensed professional interior designer or former licensed professional interior designer of the same or similar name, or is practicing under an assumed, fictitious fictitious, or corporate name, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(h) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has aided or abetted in the practice of licensed professional interior design for any person not authorized to practice licensed professional interior design under this chapter constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(i) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has been guilty of fraud or deceit constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(j) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has been guilty of negligence or willful misconduct constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(k) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has been guilty of gross incompetence constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(l) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has affixed their signature or their stamp to, or has permitted the use of their name on, plans, drawings, specifications, or other instruments of service that have not been prepared by that designer or under their immediate and responsible direction, or has permitted their name or signature or stamp to be used for the purpose of assisting a person who is not a licensed professional interior designer to evade the provisions of this chapter, constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(m) The conviction of a felony in connection with the practice of licensed professional interior design is a ground for disciplinary action. The record of a conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.(n) The fact that the licensed professional interior designer has had disciplinary action taken by any public agency for any act substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties as a professional interior designer constitutes a ground for disciplinary action.(o) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge of a felony is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.5731. (a) (1) A licensed professional interior designer shall report to the board in writing within 30 days of the date the licensed professional interior designer has knowledge of any civil action judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action resulting in a judgment, settlement, or arbitration award against the licensed professional interior designer in any action alleging fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetence, or recklessness by the licensed professional interior designer in the practice of licensed professional interior design if the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater.(2) The report required by paragraph (1) shall be signed by the licensed professional interior designer and shall set forth the facts that constitute the reportable event. If the reportable event involves the action of an administrative agency or court, the report shall set forth all of the following:(A) The title of the matter.(B) The court or agency name.(C) The docket number.(D) The claim or file number.(E) The date on which the reportable event occurred.(3) The licensed professional interior designer shall promptly respond to oral or written inquiries from the board concerning the reportable event, including inquiries made by the board in conjunction with licensure renewal.(4) Failure of a licensed professional interior designer to comply with this subdivision shall be grounds for disciplinary action.(5) A licensed professional interior designer who fails to comply with this subdivision may be subject to a civil penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) as an intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the license. A licensed professional interior designer who knowingly and intentionally fails to comply with this subdivision may be subject to a civil penalty of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) as an additional intermediate sanction imposed by the board in lieu of revoking the license.(b) (1) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of a civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in subdivision (a) against a licensed professional interior designer in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any insurer providing professional liability insurance to that licensed professional interior designer or licensed professional interior design entity shall report to the board all of the following:(A) The name of the licensed professional interior designer.(B) The claim or file number.(C) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.(D) The amount paid by the insurer.(E) The identity of the payee.(2) Within 30 days of payment of all or any portion of any civil action judgment, settlement, or arbitration award described in subdivision (a) against a licensed professional interior designer in which the amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater, any state or local governmental agency that self-insures the licensed professional interior designer shall report to the board all of the following:(A) The name of the licensed professional interior designer.(B) The claim or file number.(C) The amount or value of the judgment, settlement, or arbitration award.(D) The amount paid by the insurer.(E) The identity of the payee.(c) The reporting requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply if both of the following apply:(1) A party to the civil action, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action is or was a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, or state or local governmental agency in which a licensed professional interior designer is or was an owner, partner, member, officer, or employee.(2) A licensed professional interior designer in responsible control of the portion of the project that was the subject of the civil judgment, settlement, arbitration award, or administrative action.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed professional interior designer shall not be considered to have violated a confidential settlement agreement or other confidential agreement by providing a report to the board as required by this section.(e) The board may adopt regulations to further define the reporting requirements in subdivisions (a) and (b). Article 7. Issuance of Licenses and Revenues5735. (a) (1) A license issued under this chapter shall expire no more than two years after the issuance date. The expiration date of the original license shall be set by the board in a manner to best distribute renewal procedures throughout each year.(2) To renew an unexpired license, the licensed professional interior designer shall, on or before the expiration date of the license, apply for renewal in a form and manner prescribed by the board, and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this article.(3) The renewal form shall include a statement specifying whether the licensed professional interior designer was convicted of a crime or disciplined by another public agency during the preceding renewal period and that the designer’s representations on the renewal form are true, correct, and contain no material omissions of fact, to their best knowledge and belief.(b) Within 10 days after a judgment by a court of this state that a licensed professional interior designer has committed a crime or is liable for any death or personal or property injury or loss caused by the license holder’s licenseholder’s fraud, deceit, negligence, incompetency, or recklessness in practice, the clerk of the court that rendered the judgment shall report this to the board.(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board, and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed more than 30 days after its expiration, the licensed professional interior designer, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the delinquency fee prescribed by this article. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever occurs last. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect until the date provided pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of this section that next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, unless the license is renewed again.(d) A license that has been expired for five years or more is nonrenewable and shall not be renewed, restored, reissued, or reinstated. An individual with a nonrenewable license shall not engage in the practice of licensed professional interior design until the individual applies for, and the board issues the individual, a new license.(e) The board shall provide the authorities having jurisdiction with information about the practice and profession of licensed professional interior design.5736. (a) The fees prescribed by this article for licensed professional interior designer applicants and licensed professional interior designers shall be fixed by the board as follows:(1) The fee for an original license may not exceed ____ dollars ($____), except that, if the license is issued less than one year before the date on which it will expire, then the fee shall equal 50 percent of the fee fixed by the board for an original license. The board may, by appropriate regulation, provide for the waiver or refund of the initial licensure fee where the license is issued fewer than 45 days before the date on which it will expire.(2) The fee for a duplicate license shall not exceed ____ dollars ($____).(3) The renewal fee for a license shall not exceed____ dollars ($____).(4) The penalty for failure to notify the board of a change of address within 30 days from an actual change in address shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).(5) The delinquency fee shall be 50 percent of the renewal fee for the license in effect on the date of the renewal of the license, but not less than ____ dollars ($____) nor more than ____ dollars ($____).(b) The fees specified in subdivision (a) shall not exceed the reasonable regulatory costs of the board related to administering, implementing, and enforcing this chapter.(c) (1) There is hereby established in the State Treasury, the California Professional Interior Designer Fund. Moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made available to the board to be used in the manner prescribed by law to defray the expenses of the board in carrying out and enforcing the provisions of this chapter.(2) Within 10 days after the beginning of every month, all fees collected by the board for the preceding month under this article shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the California Professional Interior Designer Fund.SEC. 12. Section 5801 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5801. A Certified Interior Designer may obtain a stamp from the council that shall include a number that uniquely identifies and bears the name of that Certified Interior Designer and identifies the individual as one of the following:(a) A Certified Interior Designer, if the applicant has provided the council with evidence of meeting the education, experience, and examination requirements pursuant to Section 5811.1.(b) Until ____, 2027, a Certified Interior Designer with professional designation, if the Certified Interior Designer or applicant has met the requirements pursuant to Section 5811.2.SEC. 13. Section 5801.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5801.1. The procedure for the issuance of a stamp by the council under subdivision (a) of Section 5801, including the examinations recognized and required by the council, shall be subject to the occupational analyses and examination validation required by Section 139 every five to seven years.SEC. 14. Section 5811.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:5811.1. (a) (1) The council may issue a Certified Interior Designer certification pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5801 to any applicant who provides satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the requirements of this chapter and who complies with the bylaws, rules, and procedures established by the council.(2) In order to obtain a certification, an applicant shall submit an application as provided by the council and provide the council with satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the following requirements:(A) Passage of an interior design examination approved by the council.(B) Any of the following education and experience pathways:(i) The person is a graduate of a four- or five-year accredited interior design degree program, and has two years of diversified interior design experience.(ii) The person has completed a three-year accredited interior design certificate program, and has completed three years of diversified interior design experience.(iii) The person has completed a two-year accredited interior design program and has completed four years of diversified interior design experience.(iv) The person has at least eight years of interior design education, or at least eight years of diversified interior design experience, or a combination of interior design education and diversified interior design experience that together total at least eight years.(C) All fees required by the council, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 5811, have been paid.(b) (1) The certificate for a Certified Interior Designer under subdivision (a) of Section 5801 shall be subject to renewal every two years in a manner prescribed by the council, and shall expire unless renewed in that manner. The council may provide for the late renewal of a registration.(2) The council may require Certified Interior Designers to complete continuing education specific to the practice of interior design each two-year certification cycle.SEC. 15. Section 5811.2 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5811.2. (a) (1) The council may issue a professional designation to a Certified Interior Designer or qualified applicant who provides satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the requirements of this chapter and who complies with the bylaws, rules, and procedures established by the council.(2) In order to obtain a professional designation, a Certified Interior Designer or qualified applicant shall submit an application as provided by the council and provide the council with satisfactory evidence that they meet all of the following requirements:(A) Passage of an interior design examination approved by the council.(B) Any of the following education and experience pathways:(i) The person is a graduate of a four- or five-year accredited interior design degree program, and has two years of diversified interior design experience.(ii) The person has completed a three-year accredited interior design certificate program, and has three years of diversified interior design experience.(iii) The person has completed a two-year accredited interior design program and has four years of diversified interior design experience.(iv) The person has at least eight years of interior design education, or at least eight years of diversified interior design experience, or a combination of interior design education and diversified interior design experience that together total at least eight years.(C) All fees required by the council, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 5811, have been paid.(b) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the Certified Interior Designer or qualified applicant shall pass additional interior design courses and examinations, as determined to be required by the council.(c) The council may issue a professional designation to a Certified Interior Designer or qualified applicant only until ____, 2027. On and after ____, 2027, a Certified Interior Designer with an active professional designation shall not have that stamp renewed.SEC. 16. Section 8014 of the Civil Code is amended to read:8014. “Design professional” means a person licensed as an architect pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, licensed as a landscape architect pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, licensed as a professional interior designer pursuant to Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, registered as a professional engineer pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed as a land surveyor pursuant to Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.SEC. 17.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 17. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.